California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(5) Nothing in this section precludes an applicant and a local entity from mutually agreeing to an extension of any time limit provided by this section.

(d) A local entity may not enforce against the holder of a state franchise any rule, regulation, or ordinance that purports to allow the local entity to purchase or force the sale of a network.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5890.

(a) A cable operator or video service provider that has been granted a state franchise under this division may not discriminate against or deny access to service to any group of potential residential subscribers because of the income of the residents in the local area in which the group resides.

(b) Holders or their affiliates with more than 1,000,000 telephone customers in California satisfy subdivision (a) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Within three years after it begins providing video service under this division, at least 25 percent of households with access to the holder’s video service are low-income households.

(2) Within five years after it begins providing video service under this division and continuing thereafter, at least 30 percent of the households with access to the holder’s video service are low-income households.

(3) Holders provide service to community centers in underserved areas, as determined by the holder, without charge, at a ratio of one community center for every 10,000 video subscribers. The holder shall not be required to take its facilities beyond the appropriate demarcation point outside the community center building or perform any inside wiring. The community center may not receive service from more than one state franchise holder at a time under this section. For purposes of this section, “community center” means any facility operated by an organization that has qualified for the California Teleconnect Fund, as established in Section 280 and that will make the holder’s service available to the community.

(c) Holders or their affiliates with fewer than 1,000,000 telephone customers in California satisfy this section if they offer video service to all customers within their telephone service area within a reasonable time, as determined by the commission. However, the commission shall not require the holder to offer video service if the cost to provide video service is substantially above the average cost of providing video service in that telephone service area.

(d) When a holder provides video service outside of its telephone service area, is not a telephone corporation, or offers video service in an area where no other video service is being offered, other than direct-to-home satellite service, there is a rebuttable presumption that discrimination in providing service has not occurred within those areas. The commission may review the holder’s proposed video service area to ensure that the area is not drawn in a discriminatory manner.

(e) For holders or their affiliates with more than 1,000,000 telephone customers in California, either of the following shall apply:

(1) If the holder is predominantly deploying fiber optic facilities to the customer’s premise, the holder shall provide access to its video service to a number of households at least equal to 25 percent of the customer households in the holder’s telephone service area within two years after it begins providing video service under this division, and to a number at least equal to 40 percent of those households within five years.

(2) If the holder is not predominantly deploying fiber optic facilities to the customer’s premises, the holder shall provide access to its video service to a number of households at least equal to 35 percent of the households in the holder’s telephone service area within three years after it begins providing video service under this division, and to a number at least equal to 50 percent of these households within five years.

(3) A holder shall not be required to meet the 40-percent requirement in paragraph (1) or the 50-percent requirement in paragraph (2) until two years after at least 30 percent of the households with access to the holder’s video service subscribe to it for six consecutive months.

(4) If 30 percent of the households with access to the holder’s video service have not subscribed to the holder’s video service for six consecutive months within three years after it begins providing video service, the holder may submit validating documentation to the commission. If the commission finds that the documentation validates the holder’s claim, then the commission shall permit a delay in meeting the 40-percent requirement in paragraph (1) or the 50-percent requirement in paragraph (2) until the time that the holder does provide service to 30 percent of the households for six consecutive months.

(f) (1) After two years of providing service under this division, the holder may apply to the state franchising authority for an extension to meet the requirements of subdivision (b), (c), or (e). Notice of this application shall also be provided to the telephone customers of the holder, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly.

(2) Upon application, the franchising authority shall hold public hearings in the telephone service area of the applicant.

(3) In reviewing the failure to satisfy the obligations contained in subdivision (b), (c), or (e), the franchising authority shall consider factors that are beyond the control of the holder, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The ability of the holder to obtain access to rights-of-way under reasonable terms and conditions.

(B) The degree to which developments or buildings are not subject to competition because of existing exclusive arrangements.

(C) The degree to which developments or buildings are inaccessible using reasonable technical solutions under commercially reasonable terms and conditions.

(D) Natural disasters.

(4) The franchising authority may grant the extension only if the holder has made substantial and continuous effort to meet the requirements of subdivision (b), (c), or (e). If an extension is granted the franchising authority shall establish a new compliance deadline.

(g) Local governments may bring complaints to the state franchising authority that a holder is not offering video service as required by this section, or the state franchising authority may open an investigation on its own motion. The state franchising authority shall hold public hearings before issuing a decision. The commission may suspend or revoke the franchise if the holder fails to comply with the provisions of this division.

(h) If the state franchising authority finds that the holder is in violation of this section, it may, in addition to any other remedies provided by law, impose a fine not to exceed 1 percent of the holder’s total monthly gross revenue received from provision of video service in the state each month from the date of the decision until the date that compliance is achieved.

(i) If a court finds that the holder of the state franchise is in violation of this section, the court may immediately terminate the holder’s state franchise, and the court shall, in addition to any other remedies provided by law, impose a fine not to exceed 1 percent of the holder’s total gross revenue of its entire cable and service footprint in the state in the full calendar month immediately prior to the decision.

(j) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Access” means that the holder is capable of providing video service at the household address using any technology, other than direct-to-home satellite service, providing two-way broadband Internet capability and video programming, content, and functionality, regardless of whether any customer has ordered service or whether the owner or landlord or other responsible person has granted access to the household. If more than one technology is utilized, the technologies shall provide similar two-way broadband Internet accessibility and similar video programming.

(2) “Customer’s household” means those residential households located within the holder’s existing telephone service area that are customers of the service by which that telephone service area is defined.

(3) “Household” means, consistent with the United States Census Bureau, a house, an apartment, a mobilehome, a group of rooms, or a single room that is intended for occupancy as separate living quarters. Separate living quarters are those in which the occupants live and eat separately from any other persons in the building and which have direct access from the outside of the building or through a common hall.

(4) “Low-income household” means those residential households located within the holder’s existing telephone service area where the average annual household income is less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) based on the United States Census Bureau estimates adjusted annually to reflect rates of change and distribution through January 1, 2007.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a holder to provide video service outside its wireline footprint or to match the existing service area of any cable operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 123, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5895.

(a) The commission shall collect granular data on the actual locations served by the holder of a state franchise.

(b) The commission shall adopt customer service requirements for a holder of a state franchise and adjudicate any customer complaints.

(c) The commission shall not publicly disclose any personally identifiable information collected pursuant to this section.

(d) All information submitted to the commission pursuant to this section shall be disclosed to the public only as provided for pursuant to Section 583.

(e) For purposes of this section, “actual locations” include addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 801, Sec. 2.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5900.

(a) The holder of a state franchise shall comply with Sections 53055, 53055.1, 53055.2, and 53088.2 of the Government Code, and any other customer service standards pertaining to the provision of video service established by federal law or regulation or adopted by subsequent enactment of the Legislature. All customer service and consumer protection standards under this section shall be interpreted and applied to accommodate newer or different technologies while meeting or exceeding the goals of the standards.

(b) The holder of a state franchise shall comply with Section 637.5 of the Penal Code and the privacy standards contained in Section 551 and following of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(c) The local entity shall enforce all of the customer service and protection standards of this section with respect to complaints received from residents within the local entity’s jurisdiction, but it may not adopt or seek to enforce any additional or different customer service or other performance standards under Section 53055.3 or subdivision (q), (r), or (s) of Section 53088.2 of the Government Code, or any other law.

(d) The local entity shall, by ordinance or resolution, provide a schedule of penalties for any material breach by a holder of a state franchise of this section. A monetary penalty shall not be assessed for a material breach if it is out of the reasonable control of the holder. Further, a monetary penalty shall not be imposed before January 1, 2007. Any schedule of monetary penalties adopted pursuant to this section shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each day of each material breach, not to exceed
 one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for each occurrence of a material breach. However, if a material breach of this section has occurred, and the local entity has provided notice and a fine or penalty has been assessed, and if a subsequent material breach of the same nature occurs within 12 months, the penalties may be increased by the local entity to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of each material breach, not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each occurrence of the material breach. If a third or further material breach of the same nature occurs within those same 12 months, and the local entity has provided notice and a fine or penalty has been assessed, the penalties may be increased to a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day of each material breach, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each occurrence of the material breach. With respect to video providers subject to a franchise or license, any monetary
 penalties assessed under this section shall be reduced dollar-for-dollar to the extent any liquidated damage or penalty provision of a current cable television ordinance, franchise contract, or license agreement imposes a monetary obligation upon a video provider for the same customer service failures, and no other monetary damages may be assessed.

(e) The local entity shall give the video service provider written notice of any alleged material breach of the customer service standards of this division and allow the video provider at least 30 days from receipt of the notice to remedy the specified material breach.

(f) A material breach for purposes of assessing penalties shall be deemed to have occurred for each day within the jurisdiction of each local entity, following the expiration of the period specified in subdivision (e), that any material breach has not been remedied by the
 video service provider, irrespective of the number of customers or subscribers affected.

(g) Any penalty assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the local entity, which shall submit one-half of the penalty to the Digital Divide Account established in Section 280.5.

(h) Any interested person may seek judicial review of a decision of the local entity in a court of appropriate jurisdiction. For this purpose, a court of law shall conduct a de novo review of any issues presented.

(i) This section shall not preclude a party affected by this section from using any judicial remedy available to that party without regard to this section. Actions taken by a local legislative body, including a local franchising entity, pursuant to this section shall not be binding on a court of law. For this purpose, a court of
 law shall conduct de novo review of any issues presented.

(j) For purposes of this section, “material breach” means any substantial and repeated failure of a video service provider to comply with service quality and other standards specified in subdivision (a).

(k) The Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission may advocate on behalf of video subscribers regarding renewal of a state-issued franchise and enforcement of this section, and Sections 5890 and 5950. For this purpose, the office shall have access to any information in the possession of the commission subject to all restrictions on disclosure of that information that are applicable to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 201.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.

(a) The holder of a state franchise shall perform background checks of applicants for employment, according to current business practices.

(b) A background check equivalent to that performed by the holder shall also be conducted on all of the following:

(1) Persons hired by a holder under a personal service contract.

(2) Independent contractors and their employees.

(3) Vendors and their employees.

(c) Independent contractors and vendors shall certify that they have obtained the background checks required pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall make the background checks available to the holder upon request.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by contract, the holder of a state franchise shall not be responsible for administering the background checks and shall not assume the costs of the background checks of individuals who are not applicants for employment of the holder.

(e) (1) Subdivision (a) only applies to applicants for employment for positions that would allow the applicant to have direct contact with or access to the holder’s network, central office, or subscriber premises, and perform activities that involve the installation, service, or repair of the holder’s network or equipment.

(2) Subdivision (b) only applies to persons that have direct contact with or access to the holder’s network, central office, or subscriber premises, and perform activities that involve the installation, service, or repair of the holder’s network or equipment.

(f) This section does not apply to temporary workers performing emergency functions to restore the network of a holder to its normal state in the event of a natural disaster or an emergency that threatens or results in the loss of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 123, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5920.

A holder of a state franchise employing more than 750 total employees in California shall annually report to the commission all of the following:

(a) The number of California residents employed by the holder, calculated on a full-time or full-time equivalent basis.

(b) The percentage of the holder’s total domestic workforce, calculated on a full-time or full-time equivalent basis.

(c) The types and numbers of jobs by occupational classification held by residents of California employed by holders of state franchises and the average pay and benefits of those jobs and, separately,
 the number of out-of-state residents employed by independent contractors, companies, and consultants hired by the holder, calculated on a full-time or full-time equivalent basis, when the holder is not contractually prohibited from disclosing the information to the public. This paragraph applies only to those employees of an independent contractor, company, or consultant that are personally providing services to the holder, and does not apply to employees of an independent contractor, company, or consultant not personally performing services for the holder.

(d) The number of net new positions proposed to be created directly by the holder of a state franchise during the upcoming year by occupational classifications and by category of full-time, part-time, temporary, and contract employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 64.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5930.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any video service provider that currently holds a franchise with a local franchising entity in a county that is a party, either alone or in conjunction with any other local franchising entity located in that county, to a stipulation and consent judgment executed by the parties thereto and approved by a federal district court shall neither be entitled to seek a state franchise in any area of that county, including any unincorporated area and any incorporated city of that county, nor abrogate any existing franchise before July 1, 2014. Prior to July 1, 2014, the video service provider shall continue to be exclusively governed by any existing franchise with a local franchising entity for the term of that franchise and any and all issues relating to renewal, transfer, or otherwise in relation to that franchise shall be resolved pursuant to that existing franchise and otherwise applicable federal and local law. This subdivision shall not be deemed to extend any existing franchise beyond its term.

(b) When an incumbent cable operator is providing service under an expired franchise or a franchise that expires before January 2, 2008, the local entity may extend that franchise on the same terms and conditions through January 2, 2008. A state franchise issued to any incumbent cable operator shall not become operative prior to January 2, 2008.

(c) When a video service provider that holds a state franchise provides the notice required pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 5840 to a local entity, the local franchising entity may require all incumbent cable operators to seek a state franchise and shall terminate the franchise issued by the local franchising entity when the commission issues a state franchise for the video service provider that includes the entire service area served by the video service provider and the video service provider notifies the local entity that it will begin providing video service in that area under a state franchise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 123, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5940.

The holder of a state franchise under this division who also provides stand-alone, residential, primary line, basic telephone service shall not increase this rate to finance the cost of deploying a network to provide video service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5950.

The commission shall not permit a telephone corporation that is providing video service directly or through its affiliates pursuant to a state-issued franchise as an incumbent local exchange carrier to increase rates for residential, primary line, basic telephone service above the rate as of July 1, 2006, until January 1, 2009, unless that telephone corporation is regulated under rate of return regulation. However, the commission may allow rate increases to reflect increases in inflation as shown in the Consumer Price Index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. This section does not affect the authority of the commission to authorize an increase in rates for basic telephone service that is bundled with other services and priced as a bundle. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit implementation of commission decision D. 06-04-071 to the extent it has not been implemented prior to July 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5970.

Subject to the requirements of this division, a state franchise may be transferred to any successor in interest of the holder to which the certificate originally is granted, whether this transfer is by merger, sale, assignment, bankruptcy, restructuring, or any other type of transaction, provided that the following conditions are met:

(a) The transferee submits to the commission all of the information required by this division of an applicant.

(b) The transferee agrees that any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a video service provider shall continue to be honored, paid, or performed to the same extent as would be required if the video service provider continued to operate under its franchise for the duration of that franchise unless the duration of that agreement is limited by its terms or by federal or state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. PUBLIC UTILITY FRANCHISES BY LOCAL GOVERNMENTS [6001. - 6467.]



CHAPTER 1. Franchise Provisions in General [6001. - 6092.]



  ARTICLE 1. Manner of Granting [6001. - 6017.]

6001.

Every franchise or privilege to erect or lay telegraph or telephone wires, to construct or operate street or interurban railroads upon any public street or highway, to lay gas pipes for the purpose of carrying gas for light, heat, or power, to erect poles or wires for transmitting electricity for light, heat, or power, along or upon any public street or highway, or to exercise any other privilege whatever proposed to be granted by the governing or legislative body of any county, city and county, or city shall be granted upon the conditions in this article provided, and not otherwise, except when such franchises are granted pursuant to Chapters 2 or 3 of this division.

This article does not apply to franchises or privileges for railroads, or telegraph or telephone lines doing an interstate business, or to renewals of franchises for piers, chutes, or wharves, or to community antenna television systems, or to franchises or privileges for purposes not involving the furnishing of any service or commodity to the public or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.5.

(a) All franchises, licenses, permits, or other privileges granted to a public utility by any city, county, or city and county holding a freeholder’s charter, to use, or to construct, or lay and use, under, along, across, or upon the public streets, ways, alleys, and places within the municipality, facilities which are part of a pipeline system transmitting oil or products thereof, shall be granted upon the terms and conditions provided in, and in accordance with, this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6201).

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to preempt the ordinance of any chartered municipality insofar as that ordinance governs the granting of franchises to construct facilities which are part of a pipeline system transmitting oil or other products thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1444, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

The grantor may, in such a franchise, impose such other and additional terms and conditions not in conflict with this article, whether governmental or contractual in character, as in the judgment of the legislative body thereof are to the public interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

No clause or condition of any kind shall be inserted in any franchise or grant offered or sold under the terms of this article which shall directly or indirectly restrict free and open competition in bidding therefor, and no clause or provision shall be inserted in any franchise offered for sale, which shall in anywise favor one person, firm, or corporation, as against another, in bidding for the purchase thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

An applicant for a franchise or privilege shall file with the governing or legislative body of the county or municipality an application, and thereupon that body shall, in its discretion, advertise the fact of the application, together with a statement that it is proposed to grant the franchise or privilege, in one or more newpapers of the county, city and county, or city wherein the franchise or privilege is to be exercised.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

The advertisement shall state that bids will be received for the franchise and that it will be awarded to the highest bidder. The advertisement shall be published once a day for 10 successive days, or as often during that period as the paper is published, if it is a daily newspaper. If there is no daily newspaper published in the county, city and county, or city, it shall be published in a weekly newspaper once a week for four successive weeks. In either case the full publication shall be completed not less than 20 nor more than 30 days before any further action can be taken thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

The publication shall state the character of the franchise or privilege proposed to be granted, the term for which it is granted, and, if it is for a street railroad, the route to be traversed; that sealed bids therefor will be received up to a certain hour and day named therein, and that the successful bidder and his assigns shall during the life of the franchise pay to the county or municipality two percent (2%) of the gross annual receipts of the grantee arising from the use, operation, or possession of the franchise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

The advertisement shall also contain a statement that the franchise will be struck off, sold, and awarded to the person, firm, or corporation making the highest cash bid therefor; that at the time of the opening of the bids any responsible person, firm, or corporation present or represented may bid for the franchise or privilege a sum not less than 10 percent above the highest sealed bid therefor, and the bid so made may be raised not less than 10 percent by any other responsible bidder and the bidding may so continue until the franchise is finally struck off, sold, and awarded to the highest bidder therefor in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

Each sealed bid shall be accompanied with cash or a certified check payable to the treasurer of the county or municipality for the full amount of the bid, and no sealed bid shall be considered unless the cash or check is enclosed therewith. The successful bidder shall deposit at least 10 percent of the amount of his bid with the clerk of the county or municipality before the franchise is struck off to him. If he fails to make the deposit immediately his bid shall not be received, and is void, and the franchise shall then and there be again offered for sale to the bidder who makes the highest cash bid therefor, subject to the same conditions as to deposit. This procedure shall be had until the franchise is struck off, sold, and awarded to a bidder who makes the necessary deposit of at least 10 percent of the amount of his bid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

The successful bidder shall deposit with the clerk of the county or municipality, within 24 hours of the acceptance of his bid, the remaining 90 percent of the amount thereof. If the bidder fails to deposit with the clerk of the county or municipality the remaining 90 percent of his bid within 24 hours after its acceptance, the award to him of the franchise shall be set aside, the deposit made by him shall be forfeited, and no further proceedings for a sale of the franchise shall be had unless it is readvertised and again offered for sale in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.

(a) The advertisement may also contain a statement that the successful bidder for any franchise or privilege struck off, sold, and awarded under this article shall file a bond running to the county, city and county, or city, approved by the governing body. The advertisement may require a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer. The bond shall be in a penal sum prescribed by the governing body and set forth in the advertisement for bids, and conditioned that the bidder shall well and truly observe, fulfill, and perform each term and condition of the franchise, and that in case of any breach of condition of the bond, the whole amount of the penal sum therein named shall be deemed to be liquidated damages.

(b) The bond if required shall be filed with the governing body within the time specified in the advertisement and if no time is specified within five days after the franchise is awarded. The franchise shall be granted by ordinance to the person, firm, or corporation to whom it has been struck off, sold or awarded. If the bond is not filed within the time required, the award of the franchise may be set aside at any time prior to the filing and, if set aside, any money paid for the franchise shall be forfeited, and if an ordinance has been enacted granting the franchise, the governing or legislative body may repeal the ordinance and the franchise shall, in the discretion of the governing or legislative body, be readvertised and again offered for sale in the same manner and under the same restrictions, as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any franchise heretofore or hereafter granted shall not be invalid or subject to revocation because the bond required by law at the time of the award of such franchise shall not have been filed within the time then prescribed, provided the bond is filed prior to the setting aside of the award or, as the case may be, the repeal of the ordinance granting such franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

If the franchise is a renewal of a right already in existence, payment of the percentage of gross receipts shall begin at once upon the granting of the franchise. If the franchise is not a renewal of a right already in existence, no percentage shall be paid for the first five (5) years succeeding the date of the franchise, but thereafter the percentage shall be payable annually. If payment is not made, the franchise shall be forfeited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6012.

If the franchise granted is an extension of an existing street railroad system, the gross receipts shall be estimated to be one-half of the proportion of the total gross receipts of the system which the mileage of this extension bears to the total mileage of the whole system. This estimate is conclusive as to the amount of the gross receipts of the extension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.

Work to erect or lay telegraph or telephone wires, to construct street or interurban railroads, to lay gas pipes for the purpose of carrying gas for light, heat, or power, to erect poles or wires for transmitting electricity for light, heat, or power, along or upon any public street or highway, or to exercise any other privilege whatever, a franchise for which has been granted pursuant to this article, shall be commenced in good faith within not more than four months from the granting of the franchise. If not so commenced the franchise shall be declared forfeited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6014.

Work to construct street or interurban railroads shall be completed within not more than three years from the granting of the franchise, and if not so completed the franchise shall be forfeited. For good cause shown, the governing or legislative body may by resolution extend the time for completion, not exceeding three months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6015.

Work under any franchise other than for a street or interurban railroad shall be prosecuted diligently and in good faith so as to meet and fill the reasonable needs of the inhabitants of the territory for the service of which the franchise is granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

The Attorney General, upon the complaint of any county or municipality, or, in his discretion, upon the complaint of any taxpayer, shall sue for the forfeiture of any franchise granted under this article, for the noncompliance with any condition thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6017.

Any member of a governing or legislative body of any county, city and county, or city, who, by his vote, violates or attempts to violate any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished therefor as provided by law, and may be deprived of his office by the decree of a court of competent jurisdiction, after trial and conviction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transportation of Mail Carriers [6041. - 6041.]

6041.

In all cases where application is made to the governing or legislative body of a city or city and county for permission and authority to lay railroad tracks through streets or public highways of any city or city and county, the authorities before granting such permission and authority, in addition to the terms and restrictions which they are by law authorized to impose shall exact and require from the persons or corporation asking such permission and authority, as a condition precedent to the granting of permission, a satisfactory promise and undertaking to permit and allow mail carriers in the employ of the United States Government, at all times while engaged in the actual discharge of duty, to ride on the cars of such railroad without paying any sum of money whatever for fare or otherwise. All such permissions and franchises shall be subject to all other provisions of the laws of this State applicable to street railroads in general, and subject to regulations from city or city and county authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Steam Heat Franchises [6091. - 6092.]

6091.

All cities and cities and counties are empowered to grant franchises for the laying of pipes in the streets, roads, avenues, alleys, and public highways therein, for carrying steam heat under high pressure to be used, distributed, and sold to the inhabitants thereof for heating purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

6092.

The granting of franchises under this article shall be pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Gas, Oil, Electric, and Water Franchises by Municipalities [6201. - 6302.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6201. - 6205.1.]

6201.

This chapter may be cited as the Franchise Act of 1937.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.3.

As used in this chapter, “industrial gas” means any substance which is in a gaseous state at ambient conditions of temperature and pressure used for commercial, industrial, or scientific purposes, but does not include any gaseous hydrocarbon used for light, heat, power, or feedstock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.5.

As used in this chapter, municipality includes counties, but no county shall grant a franchise pursuant to this chapter in any incorporated area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 422.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

The legislative body of any municipality may grant a franchise to any person, firm, or corporation, whether operating under an existing franchise or not, to use, or to construct and use, poles, wires, conduits, and appurtenances for transmitting and distributing electricity for all purposes, or to use, or to lay and use, pipes and appurtenances for transmitting and distributing gas or industrial gas for all purposes, or to use, or to lay and use, pipes and appurtenances for transmitting and distributing oil or products thereof for all purposes, or to lay and use pipes, ditches, flumes, conduits, and appurtenances for transmitting and distributing water for all purposes, under, along, across, or upon the public streets, ways, alleys, and places within the municipality, upon the terms and conditions provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.
